Washington statutes.
RCW 11.84.150

Abuser determination—Conviction—Clear, cogent, and convincing evidence.

(1) A final judgment of conviction for conduct constituting financial exploitation against the decedent, including but not limited to theft, forgery, fraud, identity theft, robbery, burglary, or extortion, is conclusive for purposes of determining whether a person is an abuser under this section.

(2) In the absence of a criminal conviction, a superior court finding by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that a person participated in conduct constituting financial exploitation against the decedent is conclusive for purposes of determining whether a person is an abuser under this section.

[ 2009 c 525 s 15.]